District of Columbia statutes.
7-2032

Applicability and scope.

(a)

This subchapter shall apply to every child development facility and care giver in the District of Columbia.

(b)

Unless exempted by this subchapter or the laws of other jurisdictions, the provisions and requirements in this subchapter shall also apply to all child development facilities operated by the District government outside the District of Columbia.

Apr. 13, 1999, D.C. Law 12-215, § 3, 46 DCR 274
1981 Ed., § 6-3622.
See notes to § 7-2031.
For temporary addition of subchapter, see notes to § 7-2031.